Louisiana, session 2026, HB325.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5001 and 5042 are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
17:5024(D) and 5065(E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5001. Taylor Opportunity Program for Students
As part of the Louisiana Taylor Opportunity Program for Students, the state
shall provide financial assistance to any eligible student who enrolls on a full-time
basis, unless otherwise provided by law, in an eligible college or university to pursue
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 325 ENROLLED
an academic undergraduate degree or skill or occupational training as defined by the
administering agency including a vocational or technical education certificate or
diploma program or a nonacademic undergraduate degree.
* * *
§5024. Academic requirements
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a student who is
otherwise eligible for a TOPS-Tech award pursuant to this Chapter shall qualify for
the award if he meets at least two of the following requirements as determined by the
administering agency:
(a) Attainment of a minimum grade point average on the core curriculum as
provided in Subsection A of this Section.
(b) Attainment of a minimum ACT score as provided in Subsection B of this
Section.
(c) Successful completion of either at least nine credit hours of early college
credit, which may be attained through academic or technical dual enrollment courses,
or equivalent validated skills and learning measures as approved by the Statewide
Articulation and Transfer Council.
(2) The provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection are applicable to
students graduating from high school during or after the 2026-2027 academic year.
* * *
§5042. Maintaining eligibility; TOPS-Tech
A. Through the 2025-2026 academic year, to To maintain continued state
payment of any amount pursuant to a TOPS-Tech Award once enrolled in an
institution, a student shall meet all of the following:
(1) Make steady academic progress as defined by the administering agency
toward completion of the requirements of the program in which enrolled, earning not
less than the minimum number of hours of credit required for full-time standing or
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 325 ENROLLED
the required number of hours needed to complete the program's requirements. If at
any time a student fails to maintain the cumulative grade point average required for
continuation in the program or as of the end of any term during the school year fails
to make steady academic progress as defined by the administering agency, the
student shall become ineligible for further payments. Payments may be reinstated
upon attainment of the grade point average required for continuation of the original
award and the standards for steady academic progress as defined by the
administering agency, provided that the student has maintained other continuation
requirements and the period of ineligibility did not persist for more than one year
from the date of loss of eligibility. If this one-year period is interrupted due to a
student's active duty service in the United States Armed Forces, the one-year period
shall be extended for a length of time equal to the student's active duty service, not
to exceed four years, unless the student reenlists in the United States Armed Forces
and maintains continuous active duty, in which case the period shall be extended for
a length of time equal to the student's active duty service; or unless the student is
granted an exception for cause by the administering agency.
(2) Maintain continuous enrollment as a full-time student unless granted an
exception for cause by the administering agency.
(3) Have a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.50 calculated on a
4.00 scale.
(4) Have no criminal conviction, except for misdemeanor traffic violations
and, if the student has been in the United States Armed Forces and has separated
from such service, has received an honorable discharge or general discharge under
honorable conditions.
B. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, to maintain continued state
payment of any amount pursuant to a TOPS-Tech Award once enrolled in an
institution, a student shall meet all of the following:
(1) Make steady academic progress as defined by the administering agency
toward completion of the requirements of the program in which enrolled, while
enrolled either part-time or full-time. If at any time a student fails to maintain the
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 325 ENROLLED
cumulative grade point average required for continuation in the program or as of the
end of any term during the school year fails to make steady academic progress as
defined by the administering agency, the student shall become ineligible for further
payments. Payments may be reinstated upon attainment of the grade point average
required for continuation of the original award and the standards for steady academic
progress as defined by the administering agency, provided that the student has
maintained other continuation requirements and the period of ineligibility did not
persist for more than one year from the date of loss of eligibility. If this one-year
period is interrupted due to a student's active duty service in the United States Armed
Forces, the one-year period shall be extended for a length of time equal to the
student's active duty service, not to exceed four years, unless the student reenlists in
the United States Armed Forces and maintains continuous active duty, in which case
the period shall be extended for a length of time equal to the student's active duty
service; or unless the student is granted an exception for cause by the administering
agency.
(2) Maintain continuous enrollment as a full-time or part-time student unless
granted an exception for cause by the administering agency.
(3) Have a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.50 calculated on a
4.00 scale.
(4) Have no criminal conviction, except for misdemeanor traffic violations
and, if the student has been in the United States Armed Forces and has separated
from such service, has received an honorable discharge or general discharge under
honorable conditions.
* * *
§5065. Funding
* * *
E. Payment of TOPS-Tech awards for part-time students provided pursuant
to the provisions of this Chapter shall be made only from monies remaining in the
funds appropriated for the purpose of paying TOPS awards.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 325 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.